Tennessee, session 114, SB1369.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 985 of the Public Acts of 2024, is amended by deleting SECTION
22 and substituting:
SECTION 22. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-1602(10)(B), is
amended by adding the following as a new subdivision:
( ) An acute care hospital;
SECTION 23. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-1602, is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
( ) "Acute care hospital" means a hospital with a primary focus on
patients with an average length of stay of twenty-five (25) days or less;
SECTION 24. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-1607, is amended by
adding the following as a new subsection:
( ) This part does not require a certificate of need to establish or operate
an acute care hospital.
SECTION 25. For the purpose of promulgating rules, this act takes effect upon
becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes:
(1) Sections 11 and 18-21 take effect July 1, 2024, the public welfare
requiring it;
(2) Sections 1 and 2 take effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring
it;
SB1369
000843
- 1 -

(3) Sections 3-8 take effect December 1, 2025, the public welfare
requiring it;
(4) Sections 9, 10, and 12-15 take effect December 1, 2027, the public
welfare requiring it;
(5) Sections 16 and 17 take effect December 1, 2029, the public welfare
requiring it; and
(6) Sections 22-24 take effect July 1, 2028, the public welfare requiring it.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000843